Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,130
Licensure; examinations; duties; examinees.

The board shall approve and the department shall cause examinations to be administered as required for licensure in nail technology under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act for the purpose of establishing the possession of minimum competency in the knowledge and skills required on the part of the applicant.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 34;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,186;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 392.